test/src/morphology/proper-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# 

Tests:
  Propernoun - Europaráde: # MARJA-org
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Nom: Europaráde 
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen: Europaráde
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Acc: Europarádev
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ine: Europaráden 
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill: Europarádáj
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ela: Europarádes
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Com: Europarádijn
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Nom: Europaráde
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Gen: Europarádij
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Acc: Europarádijt
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Ine: Europarádijn
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Ill: Europarádijda
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Ela: Europarádijs
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Com: Europarádij
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Ess: Europaráden
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Tiensjanváre: # VARGGAT-plc
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom: [] 
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom: Tiensjanváre 
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Gen: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Acc: Tiensjanvárijt
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ine: Tiensjanvárijn
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill: Tiensjanvárijda
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ela: Tiensjanvárijs
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Ess: Tiensjanvárren
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: Tiensjanvárelasj
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: Tiensjanvárek
